New Jersey, session 222, S3507.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Election Law Enforcement Commission shall establish and operate, at all times, a toll-free hotline for the reporting of violations of The New Jersey Campaign Contributions and Expenditures Reporting Act, P.L.1973, c.83 (C.19:44A-1 et seq.), election related crimes arising under chapter 34 of Title 19 of the Revised Statutes, or any other violations of Title 19 of the Revised Statutes or the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder. The commission shall review each individual report and may refer their findings to the Office of the Attorney General, county prosecutors, or other law enforcement agencies for further action, as may be necessary and appropriate. 2.    This act shall take effect 60 days following the date of enactment.